Utah statutes.
46-1-20.   Change of name or address -- Bond policy rider.

(1)  Within 30 days of a change in the notary's name, the notary shall provide to the lieutenant governor:

(a)  the notary's new name, including official documentation of the name change; and

(b)  a bond policy rider.

(2)  To obtain a bond policy rider, the notary shall:

(a)  notify the surety for the notary's bond;

(b)  obtain a bond policy rider reflecting both the old and new name of the notary;

(c)  return a bond policy rider, the original "Certificate of Authority of Notary Public";

(d)  pay a $5 fee; and

(e)  destroy the old official seal.

(3)  Within 30 days of a change in the notary's address, the notary shall provide the notary's new address to the lieutenant governor.



Amended by Chapter 47, 2008 General Session

